Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.088

Local program centers.

The coordinator shall establish local program centers throughout the state to implement *RCW 28A.625.210 through 28A.625.230. Each center shall be managed by a center director. Additional staff as necessary may be hired.

[ 1990 c 33 s 521; 1984 c 265 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.625.240, 28A.03.438.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.625.210 through 28A.625.230 were recodified as RCW 28A.188.082 through 28A.188.086 pursuant to 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 8.

Implementation—Funding required—1984 c 265: See note following RCW 28A.188.080.